Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.180

Electronic funds and information transfer—State agency use.

(1) The office of financial management is authorized to approve the use of electronic and other technological means to transfer both funds and information whenever economically feasible, to eliminate paper documentation wherever possible, and to provide greater fiscal responsibility. This authorization includes but is not limited to the authority to approve use of electronic means to transfer payroll, vendor payments, and benefit payments and acceptance of credit cards, debit cards, and other consumer debt instruments for payment of taxes, licenses, and fees. The office of financial management shall adopt rules under RCW 43.41.110(13) to specify the manner in which electronic and other technological means, including credit cards, are available to state agencies.

(2) No state agency may use electronic or other technological means, including credit cards, without specific continuing authorization from the office of financial management.

[ 1993 c 500 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 500: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Effective and efficient management of the state's cash resources requires expeditious revenue collection, aggregation, and investment of available balances and timely payments;

(2) The use of credit cards, debit cards, and electronic transfers of funds and information are customary and economical business practices to improve cash management that the state should consider and use when appropriate;

(3) Statutory changes are necessary to aid the state in complying with the federal cash management improvement act of 1990; and

(4) The policies, procedures, and practices of cash management should be reviewed and revised as required to ensure that the state achieves the most effective cash management possible." [ 1993 c 500 s 1.]

Severability—1993 c 500: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1993 c 500 s 12.]

Effective date—1993 c 500: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 500 s 13.]